District of Columbia statutes.
22-4505

Exceptions to § 22-4504.

(a)

The provisions of §§ 22-4504(a) and 22-4504(a-1) shall not apply to:

(1)

Marshals, sheriffs, prison or jail wardens, or their deputies, policemen or other duly appointed law enforcement officers, including special agents of the Office of Tax and Revenue, authorized in writing by the Deputy Chief Financial Officer for the Office of Tax and Revenue to carry a firearm while engaged in the performance of their official duties, and criminal investigators of the Office of the Inspector General, designated in writing by the Inspector General, while engaged in the performance of their official duties;

(2)

Special police officers and campus police officers who carry a firearm in accordance with D.C. Official Code § 5-129.02, and rules promulgated pursuant to that section;

(3)

Members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marine Corps of the United States or of the National Guard or Organized Reserves when on duty, or to the regularly enrolled members of any organization duly authorized to purchase or receive such weapons from the United States; provided, that such members are at or are going to or from their places of assembly or target practice;

(4)

Officers or employees of the United States duly authorized to carry a concealed pistol;

(5)

Any person engaged in the business of manufacturing, repairing, or dealing in firearms, or the agent or representative of any such person having in his or her possession, using, or carrying a pistol in the usual or ordinary course of such business; and

(6)

Any person while carrying a pistol, transported in accordance with § 22-4504.02, from the place of purchase to his or her home or place of business or to a place of repair or back to his or her home or place of business or in moving goods from one place of abode or business to another, or to or from any lawful recreational firearm-related activity.

(b)

The provisions of § 22-4504(a) with respect to pistols shall not apply to a police officer who has retired from the Metropolitan Police Department, if the police officer has registered a pistol and it is concealed on or about the police officer.

(c)

For the purposes of subsection (a)(6) of this section, the term “recreational firearm-related activity” includes a firearms training and safety class.

History

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 651, ch. 465, § 5
May 7, 1993, D.C. Law 9-266, § 3, 39 DCR 5676
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 15(d), 41 DCR 1639
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-190, § 3, 45 DCR 7814
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305,§ 408, 48 DCR 334
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 9, 50 DCR 1092
May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-388, § 2(e), 56 DCR 1162
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 3(e), 59 DCR 5691

Cross References

District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Force, applicability of this section, see § 6-258.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-223.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3205.
1973 Ed., § 22-3205.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-305, in subsec. (a), substituted “duly appointed law enforcement officers, including special agents of the Office of Tax and Revenue, authorized in writing by the Deputy Chief Financial Officer for the Office of Tax and Revenue to carry a firearm while engaged in the performance of their official duties” for “duly appointed law enforcement officers”.
D.C. Law 14-310, in par. (4), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 17-388, in subsec. (a), substituted “pistol, transported in accordance with § 22-4504.02, from” for “pistol unloaded and in a secure wrapper from”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 deleted “to § 22-4504” at the end of the section heading; rewrote (a); substituted “§ 22-4504(a)” for “§ 22-4504” in (b); added (c); and made related changes.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-177 inserted “including criminal investigators of the Office of the Inspector General, designated in writing by the Inspector General, while engaged in the performance of their official duties” near the beginning of (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Office of the Inspector General Law Enforcement Powers Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-394, July 4, 1998, 45 DCR 4645), § 3 of the Office of the Inspector General Law Enforcement Powers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-463, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 7818), and § 3 of the Office of the Inspector General Law Enforcement Powers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-3, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2288).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(e) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).